finished/izh.lexc
Multichar_Symbols [N] [ADJ] [SG] [PL] [NOM] [GEN] [PRT] [ESS] [TRANS] [IN+ESS] [IN+ABL] [IN+ALL] [AT+ESS] [AT+ABL] [AT+ALL] {p} {ä/i} {s} {ä/öi} {a/i} {k} {v/vv} {k/kk} {p/v/pp} {k/%0} {t/%0} {ä/i} {z/ss} {z/s/ss} {p/pp} {m/mm} {a/oi} {ä/oi} {ö/öi} {k/jj/kk} {l/ll} {k/%0/kk} {e/i} {V} {mm/mp/mpp} {s/tm} {%0/t/tt} {%0/h} {n/m/mm} {%0/z/ss} {%0/z/ks}

! Stems are divided into 13 inflectional classes, mostly reflecting
! different behavior in consonant gradation.
! Special symbols such as {mm/mp/mpp} reflect the three
! grades that are possible for a stem (weak, strong, superstrong)
! These will be rewritten as mm or mp or mpp by the phonological component.

! Special symbols in suffixes that the phonological component handles are inserted now and replaced later.
! V = lengthen previous vowel
! S = strong grade
! SS = superstrong grade 
! R = raise a vowel
! A, O = vowels to be harmonized
! Z = realized as z or s depending on MSD

LEXICON Root

Noun;

LEXICON Noun

aampuussen[N]:aampuus{s/tm}    C05;
aika[N]:ai{k/jj/kk}{a/oi}      C01;
daatša[N]:daatš{a/oi}          C01;
hammaz[N]:ha{mm/mp/mpp}a       C04;
hüvä[ADJ]:hü{v/vv}{ä/i}        C01;
iez[N]:i{k/%0/kk}e             C04;
ikkuna[N]:ikkun{a/oi}          C01;
ikä[N]:i{k}{ä/i}               C01;
izä[N]:i{z/ss}{ä/öi}           C01;
jalka[N]:jal{k/%0}{a/oi}       C01;
joki[N]:jo{k/%0/kk}{e/i}       C02;
juusso[N]:juu{s}o              C02;
järvi[N]:järv{e/i}             C02;
jää[N]:jä{V}                   C03;
kala[N]:ka{l/ll}{a/oi}         C01;
karhu[N]:karhu                 C02;
kassen[N]:kas{s/tm}            C05;
kaunehusse[N]:kaunehu          C11;
kevät[N]:kevä                  C06;
korppi[N]:kor{p/pp}i           C02;
kukka[N]:ku{k}{a/i}            C01;
kuu[N]:ku{V}                   C03;
käzi[N]:kä                     C07;
lammaz[N]:la{mm/mp/mpp}a       C04;
lapsi[N]:laps{e/i}             C08;
leipä[N]:lei{p/v/pp}{ä/i}      C01;
lumi[N]:lum{e/i}               C02;
lupa[N]:lu{p/v/pp}{a/i}        C01;
luu[N]:lu{V}                   C03;
maa[N]:ma{V}                   C03;
meez[N]:mee                    C04;
mäki[N]:mä{k/%0/kk}{e/i}       C02;
nain[N]:nai{z/s/ss}{e/i}       C13;
näkö[N]:nä{k/%0/kk}ö           C02;
olut[N]:olu                    C12;
päivä[N]:päiv{ä/i}             C01;
pää[N]:pä{V}                   C03;
pökköiheinä[N]:pökköihein{ä/i} C01;
seppä[N]:se{p/pp}{ä/oi}        C01;
siar[N]:si{%0/z/ss}a           C09;
silmä[N]:sil{m/mm}{ä/i}        C01;
säkki[N]:sä{k}i                C02;
süän[N]:süä{n/m/mm}            C06;
tähti[N]:täh{t/%0}{e/i}        C08;
tüär[N]:tü{%0/t/tt}ä           C09;
variz[N]:vari{%0/z/ks}         C10;
velli[N]:vell{e/i}             C02;
vezi[N]:ve                     C07;
voi[N]:voi                     C03;
öö[N]:ö{V}                     C03;

LEXICON C02

!nominative
[NOM][SG]:RS #;  ! strong
[NOM][PL]:t  #;  ! weak

!genitive
[GEN][SG]:n      #; !weak
[GEN][PL]:lOinRS #; !strong

!partitive
[PRT][SG]:ARSS    #; !strong
[PRT][PL]:lOjARS  #; !strong

!illative
[IN+ALL][SG]:LSS      #; !strong
[IN+ALL][PL]:lOiheRS  #; !strong

!inessive
[IN+ESS][SG]:LZ     #;  !weak
[IN+ESS][PL]:lOiZRS #;  !weak

!elative
[IN+ABL][SG]:st  #;   !weak
[IN+ABL][PL]:lOistRS #; !weak

!allative
[AT+ALL][SG]:lle     #;   !weak
[AT+ALL][PL]:lOilleRS #; !weak

!adessive
[AT+ESS][SG]:Ll    #; !weak
[AT+ESS][PL]:lOilRS  #; !weak

!ablative
[AT+ABL][SG]:lt     #;
[AT+ABL][PL]:lOiltRS #;

!translative
[TRANS][SG]:ks     #;
[TRANS][PL]:lOiksRS #;

!essive
[ESS][SG]:LnSS    #;
[ESS][PL]:lOinRS #;

LEXICON C09 ! tüar

!nominative
[NOM][SG]:r       #;  
[NOM][PL]:VretSS  #; 

!genitive
[GEN][SG]:VrenSS  #;
[GEN][PL]:riinS #; 

!partitive
[PRT][SG]:Vrt    #;
[PRT][PL]:riaS  #; 

!illative
[IN+ALL][SG]:resseS      #; 
[IN+ALL][PL]:risseS      #;

!inessive
[IN+ESS][SG]:reezS   #;  
[IN+ESS][PL]:VriizS #; 

!elative
[IN+ABL][SG]:restS  #; 
[IN+ABL][PL]:ristS #; 

!allative
[AT+ALL][SG]:relleS     #;  
[AT+ALL][PL]:rilleS #; 

!adessive
[AT+ESS][SG]:reelS    #;
[AT+ESS][PL]:riilS  #; 

!ablative
[AT+ABL][SG]:reltS #;
[AT+ABL][PL]:riltS #;

!translative
[TRANS][SG]:reksS     #;
[TRANS][PL]:riksS #;

!essive
[ESS][SG]:reenS    #;
[ESS][PL]:riinS #;


LEXICON C08 ! Like C02 but different grades

!nominative
[NOM][SG]:RS #;  ! strong
[NOM][PL]:t  #;  ! weak

!genitive
[GEN][SG]:n      #; !weak
[GEN][PL]:lOinR  #; !weak

!partitive
[PRT][SG]:ARSS    #; !strong
[PRT][PL]:lOjAR   #; !weak

!illative
[IN+ALL][SG]:L        #; !weak
[IN+ALL][PL]:lOiheR   #; !weak

!inessive
[IN+ESS][SG]:LZ     #;  !weak
[IN+ESS][PL]:lOiZRS #;  !weak

!elative
[IN+ABL][SG]:st  #;     !weak
[IN+ABL][PL]:lOistRS #; !weak

!allative
[AT+ALL][SG]:lle     #;   !weak
[AT+ALL][PL]:lOilleR  #; !weak

!adessive
[AT+ESS][SG]:Ll    #; !weak
[AT+ESS][PL]:lOilR   #; !weak

!ablative
[AT+ABL][SG]:lt     #; !weak
[AT+ABL][PL]:lOiltRS #; !weak

!translative
[TRANS][SG]:ks     #; !weak
[TRANS][PL]:lOiksR  #;!weak

!essive
[ESS][SG]:Ln     #; !weak
[ESS][PL]:lOinR  #;  !weak


LEXICON C01

!nominative
[NOM][SG]:VRS #;
[NOM][PL]:Vt #;

!genitive
[GEN][SG]:Vn     #;
[GEN][PL]:XXnRSS  #;

!partitive
[PRT][SG]:VVRSS   #;
[PRT][PL]:XXARSS  #;

!illative
[IN+ALL][SG]:VVSS #;
[IN+ALL][PL]:XXRSS #;

!inessive
[IN+ESS][SG]:VVz #;
[IN+ESS][PL]:XXRz #;

!elative
[IN+ABL][SG]:Vst #; !!
[IN+ABL][PL]:XstR #;

!allative
[AT+ALL][SG]:Vlle #;
[AT+ALL][PL]:XlleR #;

!adessive
[AT+ESS][SG]:VVl   #;
[AT+ESS][PL]:XXlR   #; 

!ablative
[AT+ABL][SG]:Vlt  #;
[AT+ABL][PL]:XltR  #;

!translative
[TRANS][SG]:Vks   #;
[TRANS][PL]:XksR   #;

!essive
[ESS][SG]:VVnSS    #;
[ESS][PL]:XXnSSR    #;

! strong grade nom sg, gen pl,
! superstrong: sg: part ill ess

LEXICON C03

!nominative
[NOM][SG]:0 #;    
[NOM][PL]:t #;    

!genitive
[GEN][SG]:n     #; 
[GEN][PL]:jjenR  #;

!partitive
[PRT][SG]:tA   #;  
[PRT][PL]:tAR  #;   

!illative
[IN+ALL][SG]:hA #;  !
[IN+ALL][PL]:heR #;

!inessive
[IN+ESS][SG]:z   #;
[IN+ESS][PL]:zR #;

!elative
[IN+ABL][SG]:st #; !!
[IN+ABL][PL]:stR #;

!allative
[AT+ALL][SG]:lle #;
[AT+ALL][PL]:lleR #;

!adessive
[AT+ESS][SG]:l   #;
[AT+ESS][PL]:lR   #; 

!ablative
[AT+ABL][SG]:lt  #;
[AT+ABL][PL]:ltR  #;

!translative
[TRANS][SG]:ks   #;
[TRANS][PL]:ksR   #;

!essive
[ESS][SG]:n    #;
[ESS][PL]:nR  #;

! strong grade nom sg, gen pl,
! superstrong: sg: part ill ess


LEXICON C13 ! nain

!nominative
[NOM][SG]:R  #;       !W
[NOM][PL]:t #;        !W

!genitive
[GEN][SG]:n     #;    !
[GEN][PL]:VnRS  #;

!partitive
[PRT][SG]:taSR    #;
[PRT][PL]:VARSS  #;

!illative
[IN+ALL][SG]:VS #;
[IN+ALL][PL]:VRS #;

!inessive
[IN+ESS][SG]:Vz #;
[IN+ESS][PL]:VRz #;

!elative
[IN+ABL][SG]:st #; !!
[IN+ABL][PL]:stR #;

!allative
[AT+ALL][SG]:lle #;
[AT+ALL][PL]:lleR #;

!adessive
[AT+ESS][SG]:Vl   #;
[AT+ESS][PL]:VlR   #; 

!ablative
[AT+ABL][SG]:lt  #;
[AT+ABL][PL]:ltR  #;

!translative
[TRANS][SG]:ks   #;
[TRANS][PL]:ksR   #;

!essive
[ESS][SG]:VnSS    #;
[ESS][PL]:VnSSR    #;


LEXICON C07 ! käzi, vezi, kaunehu/tte

!nominative
[NOM][SG]:zi   #;  
[NOM][PL]:et #;  

!genitive
[GEN][SG]:en    #;    !
[GEN][PL]:ssiin  #;

!partitive
[PRT][SG]:ttA    #;
[PRT][PL]:ssiia  #;

!illative
[IN+ALL][SG]:ttee #;
[IN+ALL][PL]:ssii #;

!inessive
[IN+ESS][SG]:eez #;
[IN+ESS][PL]:ziiz #;

!elative
[IN+ABL][SG]:est #; !!
[IN+ABL][PL]:zist #;

!allative
[AT+ALL][SG]:elle #;
[AT+ALL][PL]:zille #;

!adessive
[AT+ESS][SG]:eel   #;
[AT+ESS][PL]:ziil   #; 

!ablative
[AT+ABL][SG]:elt  #;
[AT+ABL][PL]:zilt  #;

!translative
[TRANS][SG]:eks   #;
[TRANS][PL]:ziks   #;

!essive
[ESS][SG]:tteen    #;
[ESS][PL]:ssiin    #;

LEXICON C04 ! hammaz, lammaz (mm/mp/mpp/), iez, meez?

!ha{m/mp/pp}a
!i{0/k/0}e
!mee{0/h}

!nominative
[NOM][SG]:z   #;  
[NOM][PL]:VhAtSS   #;  

!genitive
[GEN][SG]:VhAnSS    #;    !
[GEN][PL]:hiinS     #;

!partitive
[PRT][SG]:st    #;
[PRT][PL]:hiäS   #;

!illative
[IN+ALL][SG]:hAsseS #;
[IN+ALL][PL]:hisseS #;

!inessive
[IN+ESS][SG]:hAAzS #;
[IN+ESS][PL]:hiizS #;

!elative
[IN+ABL][SG]:hAstS #; !!
[IN+ABL][PL]:histS #;

!allative
[AT+ALL][SG]:hAlleS #;
[AT+ALL][PL]:hilleS #;

!adessive
[AT+ESS][SG]:hAAlS   #;
[AT+ESS][PL]:hiilS   #; 

!ablative
[AT+ABL][SG]:hAltS  #;
[AT+ABL][PL]:hiltS  #;

!translative
[TRANS][SG]:hAksS   #;
[TRANS][PL]:hiksS   #;

!essive
[ESS][SG]:hAAnS    #;
[ESS][PL]:hiinS    #;


LEXICON C06 ! süän

!süän:süa{n/m/mm}

!nominative
[NOM][SG]:0     #;  
[NOM][PL]:etS   #;  

!genitive
[GEN][SG]:enS    #;    !
[GEN][PL]:iinSS     #;

!partitive
[PRT][SG]:t     #;
[PRT][PL]:iiaSS   #;

!illative
[IN+ALL][SG]:eVSS #;
[IN+ALL][PL]:iVSS #;

!inessive
[IN+ESS][SG]:eVzS #;
[IN+ESS][PL]:iVzS #;

!elative
[IN+ABL][SG]:estS #; !!
[IN+ABL][PL]:istS #;

!allative
[AT+ALL][SG]:elleS #;
[AT+ALL][PL]:illeS #;

!adessive
[AT+ESS][SG]:eVlS   #;
[AT+ESS][PL]:iilS   #; 

!ablative
[AT+ABL][SG]:eltS  #;
[AT+ABL][PL]:iltS  #;

!translative
[TRANS][SG]:eksS   #;
[TRANS][PL]:iksS   #;

!essive
[ESS][SG]:eVnSS    #;
[ESS][PL]:iVnSS    #;


LEXICON C12 ! olut

!nominative
[NOM][SG]:t   #;  
[NOM][PL]:Vvet #;  

!genitive
[GEN][SG]:Vvven    #;    !
[GEN][PL]:iziVn  #;

!partitive
[PRT][SG]:ttA    #;
[PRT][PL]:izia  #;

!illative
[IN+ALL][SG]:esse #;
[IN+ALL][PL]:isiV #;

!inessive
[IN+ESS][SG]:eez #;
[IN+ESS][PL]:iziVz #;

!elative
[IN+ABL][SG]:est #; !!
[IN+ABL][PL]:izist #;

!allative
[AT+ALL][SG]:elle #;
[AT+ALL][PL]:izille #;

!adessive
[AT+ESS][SG]:eel   #;
[AT+ESS][PL]:iziVl   #; 

!ablative
[AT+ABL][SG]:elt  #;
[AT+ABL][PL]:izilt  #;

!translative
[TRANS][SG]:eks   #;
[TRANS][PL]:iziks   #;

!essive
[ESS][SG]:een    #;
[ESS][PL]:iziVn    #;

LEXICON C05 ! ampuussen

!ampuussen:ampuu{ss/stm}

!nominative
[NOM][SG]:en   #;  
[NOM][PL]:etS   #;  

!genitive
[GEN][SG]:enS    #;    !
[GEN][PL]:iinS     #;

!partitive
[PRT][SG]:eVnt    #;
[PRT][PL]:iaS   #;

!illative
[IN+ALL][SG]:eVS #;
[IN+ALL][PL]:iVS #;

!inessive
[IN+ESS][SG]:eVzS #;
[IN+ESS][PL]:iVzS #;

!elative
[IN+ABL][SG]:estS #; !!
[IN+ABL][PL]:istS #;

!allative
[AT+ALL][SG]:elleS #;
[AT+ALL][PL]:illeS #;

!adessive
[AT+ESS][SG]:eVlS   #;
[AT+ESS][PL]:illS   #; 

!ablative
[AT+ABL][SG]:eltS  #;
[AT+ABL][PL]:iltS  #;

!translative
[TRANS][SG]:eksS   #;
[TRANS][PL]:iksS   #;

!essive
[ESS][SG]:eVnS    #;
[ESS][PL]:iVnS    #;

LEXICON C11! kaunehusse

!nominative
[NOM][SG]:sse   #;  
[NOM][PL]:et    #;  

!genitive
[GEN][SG]:en    #;    !
[GEN][PL]:ksiin     #;

!partitive
[PRT][SG]:tta    #;
[PRT][PL]:ksia   #;

!illative
[IN+ALL][SG]:tteV #;
[IN+ALL][PL]:ksiV #;

!inessive
[IN+ESS][SG]:eVz #;
[IN+ESS][PL]:ksiVz #;

!elative
[IN+ABL][SG]:est #; !!
[IN+ABL][PL]:ksist #;

!allative
[AT+ALL][SG]:elle #;
[AT+ALL][PL]:ille #;

!adessive
[AT+ESS][SG]:eVl   #;
[AT+ESS][PL]:ksiVl   #; 

!ablative
[AT+ABL][SG]:elt  #;
[AT+ABL][PL]:ksilt  #;

!translative
[TRANS][SG]:eks   #;
[TRANS][PL]:ksiks   #;

!essive
[ESS][SG]:tteVn    #;
[ESS][PL]:ksiVn   #;



LEXICON C10! variz

!nominative
[NOM][SG]:0S      #;  
[NOM][PL]:etSS    #;  

!genitive
[GEN][SG]:enSS     #;   
[GEN][PL]:iinSS    #;

!partitive
[PRT][SG]:ist    #;
[PRT][PL]:iaSS   #;

!illative
[IN+ALL][SG]:eVSS #;
[IN+ALL][PL]:iVSS #;

!inessive
[IN+ESS][SG]:eVzSS #;
[IN+ESS][PL]:iVzSS #;

!elative
[IN+ABL][SG]:estSS #; !!
[IN+ABL][PL]:istSS #;

!allative
[AT+ALL][SG]:elleSS #;
[AT+ALL][PL]:illeSS #;

!adessive
[AT+ESS][SG]:eVlSS   #;
[AT+ESS][PL]:iVlSS   #; 

!ablative
[AT+ABL][SG]:eltSS  #;
[AT+ABL][PL]:iltSS  #;

!translative
[TRANS][SG]:eksSS   #;
[TRANS][PL]:iksSS   #;

!essive
[ESS][SG]:eVnSS    #;
[ESS][PL]:iVnSS   #;
